Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202018-2414
Project, defined.

Project shall mean any power project, sewerage project, solid waste disposal project, waterworks project, or any combination of two or more thereof or any interest therein or right to capacity thereof. Project does not include the construction, maintenance, or remodeling of an agency's headquarters office building or any other improvements thereto.

Laws 1981, LB 132, § 14;

Laws 2020, LB858, § 4.
August 07, 2020